Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 5. Miscellaneous.

Sec. 24.55.230.
Annual report.

The ombudsman shall submit to the public an annual report of the ombudsman’s activities under this chapter and notify the legislature that the report is available.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975; am § 51 ch 21 SLA 1995)

Sec. 24.55.240.
Judicial review.

A proceeding or decision of the ombudsman may be reviewed in superior court only to determine if it is contrary to the provisions of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975)

Sec. 24.55.250.
Immunity of the ombudsman.

A civil action may not be brought against the ombudsman or a member of the ombudsman’s staff for anything done, said, or omitted in performing the ombudsman’s duties or responsibilities under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975)

Sec. 24.55.260.
Ombudsman’s privilege not to testify or disclose documents.

The ombudsman and staff of the ombudsman may not testify or be deposed in a judicial or administrative proceeding regarding matters coming to their attention in the exercise of their official duties, except as may be necessary to enforce the provisions of this chapter.

The records of the ombudsman and staff of the ombudsman, including notes, drafts, and records obtained from an individual or agency during intake, review, or investigation of a complaint, and any reports not released to the public in accordance with AS

24.55.200

, are not subject to disclosure or production in response to a subpoena or discovery in a judicial or administrative proceeding, except as the ombudsman determines may be necessary to enforce the provisions of this chapter. Disclosure by the ombudsman is subject to the restrictions on disclosure in AS

24.55.160

—

24.55.190

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975; am § 5 ch 38 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For the effect of this section as repealed and reenacted on Rule 501, Alaska Rules of Evidence, see sec. 7, ch. 38, SLA 2014 in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 16, 2014, rewrote the section, which read, “The ombudsman and the staff of the ombudsman may not testify in a court regarding matters coming to their attention in the exercise or purported exercise of their official duties except as may be necessary to enforce the provisions of this chapter.”

Sec. 24.55.270.
Letters to or from ombudsman.

A letter to the ombudsman from a person held in custody by an agency shall be forwarded immediately, unopened, to the ombudsman.
A letter from the ombudsman to a person held in custody by an agency shall be delivered immediately, unopened, to the person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975)

Sec. 24.55.275.
Procurement procedures.

The ombudsman shall adopt by regulation procurement procedures that are appropriate for the office of the ombudsman and that are similar to those adopted by the legislative council under AS

36.30.020

, as they may be amended from time to time. The procedures shall be followed by the office of the ombudsman in contracting for professional and other services, supplies, and office space, and for construction limited to providing and maintaining office space for the office of the ombudsman. However, competitive principles in the procurement procedures adopted by the legislative council under AS

36.30.020

do not apply to contracts for investigations under AS

24.55.100

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 144 SLA 1982; am § 23 ch 106 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 137 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 59 SLA 2013; am § 6 ch 38 SLA 2014)

Cross references. —

For transitional provisions relating to certain solicitations, notices of intent to award, or responses to solicitation made before the effective date of the relevant change in law enacted by §§ 1-45 and 47-56 of ch. 137, SLA 1996, see § 51, ch. 137, SLA 1996 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For procurement, see 21 AAC 10, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective June 27, 2013, at the end of the second sentence, substituted “the five percent preference under AS

36.30.321(a)

” for “AS 36.30.170(b)”.

The 2014 amendment, effective September 16, 2014, rewrote the section, which read, “The ombudsman shall adopt by regulation procedures consistent with AS 36.30 to be followed by the office of the ombudsman in contracting for services. However, the procedure for requests for proposals does not apply to contracts for investigations under AS

24.55.100

, and the office of the ombudsman shall comply with the five percent preference under AS

36.30.321(a)

.”

Sec. 24.55.280.
Time for judicial review of agency action.

This chapter in no way extends the time limit in which judicial review of agency action must be sought.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975)

Sec. 24.55.290.
Penalty.

A person who wilfully hinders the lawful actions of the ombudsman or the staff of the ombudsman, or who wilfully refuses to comply with their lawful demands, or who wilfully violates AS

24.55.270

, is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000.

History.

(§ 1 ch 32 SLA 1975)